Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2615
Insurance consultant; license; violation; penalty.

No person shall act as an insurance consultant until he or she has been licensed as provided by sections 44-2606 to 44-2635. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 10;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 206.